Wyoming, session 2026, SF0088.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-2-320(a) by creating a new
paragraph (v) and (e) by creating a new paragraph (iii),
7-19-302 by creating a new subsection (w) and
7-19-303(c)(ii) are amended to read:
6-2-320. Prohibited access to school facilities and
child care facilities by adult sex offenders; exceptions;
penalties; definitions.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, no person who is eighteen (18) years of age or
older who is required to register as a sex offender
pursuant to W.S. 7-19-302 shall:
(v) Reside within one thousand (1,000) feet of
the property where a child care facility is located,
measured from the nearest point on the exterior wall of the
registered offender's dwelling unit to the child care
facility's property line, except that this paragraph shall
not apply if the registered offender's residence was
established before July 1, 2026 or before the date when the
child care facility was established at the location.
(e) As used in this section:
(iii) "Child care facility" means one (1) or
more of the following:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 52, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) A facility licensed as a child care
provider by the department of family services;
(B) A facility that is administered, owned
or supervised by a governmental entity, including the
state, local governments and school districts, and that
provides care for children in exchange for consideration at
the request of the parents, legal guardians or an agency
responsible for the children. A facility under this
subparagraph shall not include an elementary, middle or
high school.
7-19-302. Registration of offenders; procedure;
verification; fees.
(w) Upon receiving information from an offender under
this section, the division shall verify the residential
address of the offender to determine whether the offender
lives near a child care facility as defined by W.S.
6-2-320(e)(iii) and whether any of the exceptions in W.S.
6-2-320(a)(v) apply. Upon request by an offender, the
sheriff or the division shall determine whether an address
provided by the offender is within one thousand (1,000)
feet of a child care facility as defined by W.S.
6-2-320(e)(iii).
7-19-303. Offenders central registry; dissemination
of information.
(c) The division shall provide notification of
registration under this act, including all registration
information, to the district attorney of the county where
the registered offender is residing at the time of
registration or to which the offender moves. In addition,
the following shall apply:
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 52, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(ii) If the offender was convicted of an offense
specified in W.S. 7-19-302(h) or (j), notification shall be
provided by mail, personally or by any other means
reasonably calculated to ensure delivery of the notice to
residential neighbors within at least seven hundred fifty
(750) feet of the offender's residence, organizations in
the community, including schools, religious and youth
organizations by the sheriff or his designee. The division
shall provide notice to each child care facility as defined
by W.S. 6-2-320(e)(iii) within at least one thousand
(1,000) feet of the offender's residence. In addition,
notification regarding an offender employed by or attending
school at any educational institution shall be provided
upon request by the educational institution to a member of
the institution's campus community as defined by subsection
(h) of this section;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0088
ENROLLED ACT NO. 52, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4